Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.030

Commission established by referendum.

The Washington state honey bee commission shall be established following approval of a referendum by a majority of the affected apiarists and brokers, as set forth in RCW 15.62.140(4) for assessment increases.

[ 1989 c 5 s 3.]